Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-1007
Sale of trust property; notice; contents; time and place of sale.

(1) The trustee or the attorney for the trustee shall give written notice of the time and place of sale particularly describing the property to be sold by publication of such notice, at least five times, once a week for five consecutive weeks, the last publication to be at least ten days but not more than thirty days prior to the sale, in some newspaper having a general circulation in each county in which the property to be sold, or some part thereof, is situated.

(2) The sale shall be held at the time and place designated in the notice of sale which shall be between the hours of nine a.m. and five p.m. and at (a) the premises, (b) the courthouse of the county in which the property to be sold, or some part thereof, is situated, or (c) a public building wherein one or more county offices are located within the county in which the property to be sold, or some part thereof, is situated.

(3) The notice of sale shall be sufficient if made in substantially the following form:

Notice of Trustee's Sale

The following described property will be sold at public auction to the highest bidder at the .......... door of the county courthouse in .............., County of ............, Nebraska, on ........., 20.... .

(Name of Trustee) .......................................

Laws 1965, c. 451, § 7, p. 1426;

Laws 2004, LB 813, § 29;

Laws 2006, LB 876, § 53;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 80.